GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/src/lex-empty.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 (template file for place names)
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 26-Oct-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 	(add as appropriate)
!#
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop		! proper name			(e.g. "America", "Denmark")
+Noun		! demonym noun 			(e.g. "Dane")	
+Adj		! demonym adjective		(e.g. "Danish")
+NAdj		! demonym noun or adjective	(e.g. "American")

+PostMod	! post-modifier [not used]
+PreMod		! pre-modifier	(e.g. "East")
+Head		! head word  	(e.g. "County")

+Continent	!
+Country	! country/nation of the world
+UsaState	! state of the USA
+State		! state/province of other country
+County		! county of GB
+Region		! other region (not further classified)
+City		!
+River
+Loc		! location (in general)

+Place		! unclassified place name (from original analyser)


+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym

+Sg		! singular
+Pl		! plural
+SP		! singular and plural
+Gen		! genitive/possessive 's

! for internal use:
^MAN		! for irregular plura -man -> -men
^AND		! " and " or "&"
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation
^PlE		! plural ending with -e-


! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
! PLACE =  	[ +City | +Continent | +Country | +Conty | +Loc 
!		| +Region | +River | +State | +UsaState ] ;
! --------
! [+] NOTE: PLACE* indicates that several place tags may appear together:
!		e.g. 	"Washington+Prop+City+UsaState+Sg"
!			"Valencia+Prop+City+Region+Sg"
!			"Valencian+NAdj+City+Region+Sg"
! --------
!
!	+Prop PLACE* 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Acron|+Abbr)
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# NOTE: white space ( ) and literal zeros (0) must be escaped by a precent sign %

LEXICON ROOT
! sample entries  (remove or comment as appropriate)
New% York+City					PROP/SG;	!# multi-word city name, singular only
Arab% Republic% of% Egypt+Country		PROP/SG;	!# multi-word country name, singular only
Zwolle+Place					PROP/SG;	!# place name (not further classified)
Alps+Region                                     PROP/PL;  	!# region name, plural only
Heard% Island+Country                           PROP;  		!# country name, singular and plural possible

! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! ADD NEW ENTRIES HERE






! END OF LEXICON ENTRIES
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

!# ============================================================================
!# CONTINUATION CLASSES
!# ============================================================================

LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;

LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;
